Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General

§ 31-7-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Driver’s License Act.”

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.1; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Cited

in

Wyo. DOT v. State Ex Rel. DOT, 2012 WY 33, 271 P.3d 1003,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Mar. 6, 2012).

§ 31-7-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Alcohol” means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including but not limited to, ethanol, methanol, propanol and isopropanol;

“Alcohol concentration” means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood;

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath; or

The number of grams of alcohol per seventy-five (75) milliliters of urine.

“Bus” means every motor vehicle designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver;

“Cancellation” means the annulment or termination by formal action of the division of a person’s license because of some error or defect in the license or because the licensee is no longer entitled to the license;

“Commerce” means:

Trade, traffic and transportation within the jurisdiction of the United States between a place in a state and a place outside of the state, including a place outside the United States; and

Trade, traffic and transportation in the United States which affects any trade, traffic and transportation in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

“Commercial driver’s license” means a license issued in accordance with the requirements of this act to an individual which authorizes the individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle;

“Commercial driver license information system” is the information system established pursuant to the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, 49 U.S.C. 31106, to serve as a clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers;

“Commercial vehicle” or “commercial motor vehicle” means any vehicle or vehicle combination used in commerce to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a gross vehicle combination weight rating or gross combination weight of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) or more pounds, whichever is greater, inclusive of a towed unit or units with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of more than ten thousand (10,000) pounds, whichever is greater; or

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver; or

Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous materials as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxiii); or

Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more, whichever is greater.

“Commission” means the transportation commission of Wyoming or any authorized employee of the commission charged with the administration of this act;

“Controlled substance” includes:

Any drug or substance defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv);

Any glue, aerosol or other toxic vapor which when intentionally inhaled or sniffed results in impairment of an individual’s ability to drive safely.

“Conviction” means a final conviction and shall include:

An unvacated adjudication of guilt or a determination of a violation in a court of original jurisdiction or an administrative proceeding;

An unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court;

A plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court;

The payment of a fine or court cost; or

Violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether the penalty is rebated, suspended or probated.

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Disqualification” means a prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle;

“Division” means the division within the department which is designated to administer this act;

“Drive” means to function as a driver in any place open to the general public for purpose of vehicular traffic;

“Driver” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Employee” means any operator of a commercial motor vehicle, including full time, regularly employed drivers, casual, intermittent or occasional drivers, leased drivers and independent, owner-operator contractors who are either directly employed by or under lease to an employer;

“Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial motor vehicle;

“Endorsement” means an authorization placed upon an individual’s driver’s license to permit the individual to operate certain types of motor vehicles;

“Felony” means any offense under state or federal law that is punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year;

“Gross combination weight rating (GCWR)” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination vehicle. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, GCWR will be determined by adding the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and any load thereon;

“Gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR)” means the weight specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle;

“Hazardous materials” means as defined in the federal motor carrier safety regulations, 49 C.F.R. 383.5;

“Impaired person” means a person who is afflicted with or suffering from a mental, emotional, physical impairment or disease that may impair the person’s ability to safely operate a motor vehicle;

“License”, “driver’s license”, “digital driver’s license”, “commercial driver’s license”, “instruction permit”, “commercial learner’s permit” or “intermediate permit” means a license or permit secured by a person from the division, in accordance with this act which grants the privilege to drive or operate a motor vehicle on the public highways, streets and roads of this state;

“License fee” means the fee imposed by this act;

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle which is self-propelled and designed for normal use on the highways;

“Motorcycle” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this state;

“Nonresident operating privilege” is the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the driving by the person of a motor vehicle or the use of a vehicle in this state;

“Other law prohibiting driving while under the influence” means a statute of another state, the United States, a territory or district of the United States or an ordinance of a governmental entity of this or another state or of an Indian tribe which prohibits driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, alcohol, controlled substances or drugs;

“Out-of-service” means a temporary prohibition against driving a commercial motor vehicle;

“Owner” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Pedestrian vehicle” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Registration” means the registration certificate or certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles;

“Representative vehicle” means a motor vehicle which represents the type and class of motor vehicle that the driver applicant operates or expects to operate;

“Resident” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxi)(A);

“Restriction” means a restriction placed on an individual’s license to indicate the driver’s eligibility to operate a motor vehicle;

“Revocation” means the termination by formal action of the division of a person’s license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways;

“School bus” means every motor vehicle that is owned by, leased to or registered to a public school district, a private school or a carrier under contract to a public or private school and is used to transport children to or from school or in connection with school activities and is designed for and capable of carrying sixteen (16) or more passengers, but not including buses operated by common carriers in transportation of school children;

“Serious traffic violation” means:

Excessive speeding, as defined by rule and regulation of the United States secretary of transportation involving any single offense for any speed of fifteen (15) miles per hour or more above the posted speed limit;

Reckless driving as defined by W.S.

31-5-229

;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 11, § 2.

Erratic lane changes;

Following the vehicle ahead too closely;

A violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, arising in connection with a fatal accident;

Driving a commercial vehicle without obtaining a commercial driver’s license;

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver’s license in the driver’s possession. An individual shall not be guilty of a violation of this subparagraph if the individual provides proof prior to or at a court or administrative hearing establishing that the individual held a valid commercial driver’s license on the date of the citation; or

Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of commercial driver’s license or endorsements for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported.

“State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;

“State of domicile” means the state where a person has his true, fixed and permanent home and principal residence and to which he has the intention of returning whenever he is absent;

“Suspension” means the temporary withdrawal for a specified period by formal action of the division of a person’s license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways;

“Tank vehicle” means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or tanks having an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred nineteen (119) gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand (1,000) gallons or more which are either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. A commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank, not designed for transportation, with a rated capacity of one thousand (1,000) gallons or more that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer is not considered a tank vehicle;

“Vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(lviii);

“Multipurpose vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);

“Commercial learner’s permit” means a permit issued to an individual which, when carried with a valid driver’s license issued in accordance with this act, authorizes an individual to operate a commercial motor vehicle when accompanied by a passenger holding a valid commercial driver’s license for the class and type of vehicle being driven;

“Digital driver’s license” means a secure electronic representation of a physical driver’s license that is stored on the driver’s portable electronic device and may be viewed or verified by a person to whom access is allowed. A digital driver’s license is optional to purchase, supplemental to a physical driver’s license and may be accepted in lieu of a physical driver’s license at the option of the person requesting or requiring proof of licensure or identification;

“Last known address” means the address, email address or other electronic contact information, as applicable, according to the sending method, on file with the division;

“Portable electronic device” means an electronic device that is portable in nature, is easily carried or conveyed by hand and may be used to display, transmit, or both;

“REAL ID Act” means the REAL ID Act of 2005, Public Law 109-13, 119 Stat. 302, enacted May 11, 2005, and subsequent amendments thereto;

“This act” means W.S.

31-7-101

through

31-7-313

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.2; Laws 1977, ch. 28, § 1; 1979, ch. 13, § 1, ch. 89, § 2; 1983, ch. 28, § 1; 1984, ch. 41, § 3; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 33, § 2; ch. 189, § 1; 1989, ch. 176, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 145, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2004, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 197, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 31, § 1; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to driver's license suspension for nonpayment of child support, see §

20-6-111

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(xli)(D) through (a)(xli)(J), and repealed former (a)(xli)(C), which listed vehicular homicide.

The 2005 amendment,

effective September 16, 2005, in (a)(xxv), inserted “or intermediate permit” and substituted “a license” for “any license.”

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “49 U.S.C. 31106” for “49 (APP) U.S.C. § 2706” in (a)(vii).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xxiii), substituted “federal motor carrier safety regulations, 49 C.F.R. 383.5” for “Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 App. U.S.C. § 1803 (49 U.S.C. § 5102)”; in (a)(xl), inserted “district, a private school or a carrier under contract to a public or private school,” deleted “or buses owned by a community college or the University of Wyoming”; and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, rewrote (a)(viii); added “commercial learner’s permit” following “instruction permit” in (a)(xxv); rewrote (a)(xlv); added (a)(xlviii); and redesignated former (a)(xlviii) as (a)(xlix).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xxv), added “ ‘digital driver's license’ ” following “ ‘driver's license’ ”; redesignated former (a)(xlix) as (a)(liii) and added (a)(xlix) through (a)(lii).

Editor's notes. —

The Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, 49 (APP) U.S.C. § 2706, referred to in paragraph (a)(vii), was repealed by P.L. 103-272. For present similar provisions, see 49 U.S.C. § 31106 et seq.

There is no subparagraph (a)(xli)(I) nor subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Tribal law as “other law.” —

A conviction for driving under the influence pursuant to Tribal law may support the revocation of a driver's license. Pogue v. Allison, 851 F. Supp. 1536, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6234 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Driver's license as right not privilege. —

Because a driver's license was not a fundamental right, but a privilege, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xxv), due process was not violated by the utilization of a preponderance of the evidence in commercial driver's license revocation proceedings under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

31-7-305

and

31-7-307

.
State v. Robbins, 2011 WY 23, 246 P.3d 864,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2011).

Conviction. —

After defendant pled guilty to having four driving under the influence (DUI) convictions in a five-year period, the district court did not err in sentencing defendant under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-233

because, based on his own testimony and the records on appeal, he had been convicted, as defined in the plain and unambiguous language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xi), of DUI four times in the previous five years.
Seteren v. State, 2007 WY 144, 167 P.3d 20,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2007).

Definitive event constituting a conviction may be any one of the events described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xi) (A-E). The statute provides fair warning to those who violate the driving while intoxicated or impaired statutes that such is the case.
Robison v. State, 2011 WY 4, 246 P.3d 259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2011).

Definitive event constituting a conviction may be any one of the events described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xi) (A-E). The statute provides fair warning to those who violate the driving while intoxicated or impaired statutes that such is the case.
Robison v. State, 2011 WY 4, 246 P.3d 259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Wylie v. Wyoming DOT, 970 P.2d 395,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

City of Laramie v. Cowden, 777 P.2d 1089,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1989); Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997); Wyo. DOT v. State Ex Rel. DOT, 2012 WY 33, 271 P.3d 1003,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Mar. 6, 2012).

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act applicable to persons applying for a license or permit who are under the age of 17 on September 16, 2005, and who do not have a valid driver's license from Wyoming or another jurisdiction.

§ 31-7-103.
Administration and enforcement.

The administration of this act shall be exercised by the department, which may prescribe forms and reasonable rules and regulations in conformity with this act and the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act under W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

. Provisions of this act prevail over the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act if there is a conflict. The department shall keep records of all monies received and disbursed. The records shall be open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his designee and the legislative service office. The highway patrol and all peace officers of any county or municipality shall aid in the enforcement of this act.

The department shall perform background checks on all persons engaged in the manufacture or production of driver’s licenses or state identification cards including, but not limited to, all persons who have the ability to affect identity information appearing on driver’s licenses or identification cards. The background check shall include a verification of any references and a name and fingerprint based criminal history records check. The background check also shall include a check of the federal bureau of investigation’s databases and the Wyoming department of criminal investigation’s database. The department shall by rule and regulation establish criteria for the qualification of persons permitted to access documents described under this section.

The department shall require fraudulent document recognition training for all employees handling those documents listed in W.S. 31-7-111(a) or engaged in the issuance of driver’s licenses or identification cards.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.3; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.3; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 205; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added (b) and (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “audit division of the” preceding “legislative service office.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “and the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act under W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

. Provisions of this act prevail over the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act if there is a conflict” following “in conformity with this act” and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Modification of suspension limited by § 31-7-105(f). —

The discretion of the Department of Transportation to continue or modify any order of driver's license suspension to allow driving privileges is limited by the restriction in § 31-7-105(f), “once to any person in a five (5) year period”. Parodi v. Wyoming DOT, 947 P.2d 1294,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 31-7-104.
Disposition of fees.

Except as provided in this section and W.S. 31-7-113(g), the license fees levied and collected under this act are payable to the department and shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the highway fund. Subject to the allocation in W.S. 31-7-113(g), the fees collected under W.S. 31-7-113(a)(x) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the motorcycle safety education account created by W.S.

31-5-1506

. Funds collected under W.S. 31-7-111(b)(xiv) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.4; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.4; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1995, ch. 146, § 2; 2020 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 152, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "and W.S. 31-7-113(g)" in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added "Subject to the allocation in W.S. 31-7-113(g)," and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-105.
Administrative hearings.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 30, § 3.

A hearing examiner designated by the office of administrative hearings created by W.S.

9-2-2201

shall sit as the administrative hearing agency for the department to hear all:

Contested cases involving per se suspensions involving a question of law, medical cancellations and denials, accident suspensions, commercial drivers license disqualifications and any other action as defined by department rule and regulation;

Appeals from the record review of the department.

Any order of a hearing examiner may be appealed to the district court. The person whose license or driving privilege is affected may file a petition for a review of the record in the district court in the county where the person resides or in the case of a nonresident in Laramie county or the county where the offense is alleged to have occurred. The person shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the written order in which to file the petition for review. The district court shall immediately set the matter for determination upon thirty (30) days written notice to the department.

Except for driving privileges that have been suspended for nonpayment of child support, before suspending, revoking, canceling or denying the license or driving privilege of any person under this act or disqualifying a person from driving a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to W.S.

31-7-305

and

31-7-307

, the department shall immediately advise the licensee in writing:

Of his right to request a hearing;

If the request for hearing is only to receive limited driving privileges, that the request shall be for a record review conducted by the department. The request for a record review under this paragraph shall be accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00);

If the request for hearing is for any purpose other than specified under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section, that the request shall be for a hearing before a hearing examiner within the office of administrative hearings. The request for a hearing before the office of administrative hearings under this paragraph shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The licensee has twenty (20) days from the date the department denies the license or gives the notice of intent to suspend, revoke or cancel the license or disqualify the licensee from driving a commercial motor vehicle within which to request a hearing or the opportunity for a hearing is waived. If the request for a hearing is timely and the request is for a contested case, the department shall forward the request and certified record to the hearing examiner who shall schedule a hearing within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the certified record at a time and place specified by the hearing examiner. The hearing examiner shall provide the licensee notice of the hearing at least ten (10) days in advance of the hearing. If the hearing examiner fails to schedule the hearing within forty-five (45) days of the request, other than at the request of the licensee, the licensee, as his sole remedy, shall be given credit against any action upheld at the hearing for the time between the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period and the date the hearing was first scheduled. The hearing examiner may administer oaths, subpoena and compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of relevant books, papers and other evidence reasonably necessary to resolve the matters under consideration in accordance with W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

and may require reexamination of the licensee. The hearing examiner shall issue subpoenas upon his own motion or upon the request of any party to the proceedings in compliance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. Upon hearing, the hearing examiner shall either rescind or uphold the action or upon a showing of good cause, may continue or modify a suspension of the license.

Upon receipt of a timely request, the department shall conduct a review of its records and issue an order granting or denying limited driving privileges. The discretion to continue or modify any order of suspension or denial to allow driving privileges is limited as follows:

It shall be extended only in cases where failure to do so would cause an undue hardship;

Except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection, it shall be extended only once to any person in a five (5) year period;

It may be extended to a person convicted under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence, or a person whose driver’s license has been suspended or denied for a violation of W.S.

31-5-234

, only if:

Within the five (5) year period preceding the date of the most recent offense, the person has not been convicted under W.S.

31-5-233

or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence; and

The person agrees to pursue and completes an alcohol education or treatment program as the department prescribes.

A person whose driving privileges have been suspended for nonpayment of child support may be granted limited driving privileges for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days upon request of the individual to the department after receipt of the notice of suspension of driving privileges pursuant to W.S.

20-6-111

. A person granted limited driving privileges under this paragraph shall not be granted an extension of such privileges for twelve (12) months after the limited driving privileges expire unless the person has subsequently made full payment on his child support obligation in arrears, or is in full compliance with a payment plan approved by the department of family services;

It shall not be granted in cases of:

Revocation;

A conviction under W.S. 31-5-233 or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence if there has been another conviction under W.S. 31-5-233 or other law prohibiting driving while under the influence within the five (5) year period preceding the date of the offense upon which the conviction at issue is based;

A cancellation;

A suspension under the Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act or W.S.

31-6-102

;

A denial under W.S. 31-7-108(b);

A disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle under W.S.

31-7-305

and

31-7-307

;

A licensee under nineteen (19) years of age who has had his license suspended under W.S. 31-7-128(f) unless at least one-third (1/3) of the total license suspension period has elapsed and the licensee has complied with or is complying with all requirements or conditions imposed by the court resulting from the conviction;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 275.26; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 276.26; Laws 1973, ch. 248, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 39-43.11; Laws 1977, ch. 45, § 3; ch. 111, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 276.4:1; W.S. 1977, §§

31-7-105

,

31-7-127

; Laws 1981, ch. 117, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 176, § 2; 1990, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 30, §§ 2, 3; ch. 69, § 1; 1993, ch. 136, § 1; ch. 145, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 1998, ch. 102, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 155, § 1; 2011, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

The 2004 amendment,

in (f)(iv), substituted “W.S. 20-6-111(n)(iii)” for “W.S. 20-6-111(g)(iii).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “Except for driving privileges that have been suspended for nonpayment of child support” at the beginning of (d); and substituted “request of the individual to the department after receipt of the notice of suspension of driving privileges pursuant to W.S.

20-6-111

” for “receipt of the notice required under W.S.

20-6-111

(n)(iii)” in the first sentence of (f)(iv).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(i), deleted “implied consent refusals” following “Contested cases involving”; and repealed former (f)(v)(H), pertaining to suspension or denial of driver's license for violation of W.S.

31-5-234

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Motor Vehicle-Safety Responsibility Act. —

See §§

31-9-101

and 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in the introductory language of subsection (d), see
§

31-7-102

(a)(xlix).

Department not required to provide hearing before it sends notice and receives request. —

The division (now department) was not required to provide a hearing within 45 days of the receipt of the defendant's request, because the 45-day period could not begin to run before the division had sent notice and had received the defendant's request for a hearing pursuant to that notice. The triggering event under this section is the giving of notice by the division (now department) of intent to suspend or revoke the license. State ex rel. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. Vase, 721 P.2d 37,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 568

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to second 1992 amendment).

Restriction on limited driving privileges constitutional. —

The classification in subsection (f)(iii)(A), which mandates that no second time driving-while-under-the-influence offender can be eligible to receive a discretionary grant of limited driving privileges, is constitutional under the due process guarantees of both the U.S. Const., amends. V and XIV, and the Wyo Const., art. 1, § 6. Moreno v. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 775 P.2d 497,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1989).

Limits on modifications of suspension orders. —

The limitations imposed on the department of transportation by subsection (f) circumscribe with equal force and effect the authority of a hearing examiner in contested case hearings, and a hearing examiner may not modify a suspension more than once within a five-year period. Parodi v. Wyoming DOT, 947 P.2d 1294,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1997).

No modification to five year restriction. —

Subsection (e) does not allow a hearing examiner to ignore that five year restriction in subsection (f), even upon a showing of “good cause”, because hearing examiners cannot order the Wyoming Department of Transportation to violate the law set out in subsection (f). Parodi v. Wyoming DOT, 947 P.2d 1294,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983); Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Hamilton, 743 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 31-7-106.
License required; limited to one license.

No person, unless exempt under this act shall drive, steer or exercise any degree of physical control of any motor vehicle or a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless the person has been issued a driver’s license for the class and type and applicable endorsements valid for the motor vehicle being driven.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 3.

No person shall have more than one (1) valid driver’s license or any other state-issued, REAL ID Act-compliant identification card at any time. A person shall surrender to the division all valid physical driver’s licenses or state-issued, REAL ID Act or other applicable federal law compliant identification cards in his possession or any person who has been previously licensed or issued an identification card in this or any other state but who does not have in their possession the license or identification card previously issued in this or any other state shall complete an affidavit of “No License/ID Card in Possession”, before receiving a driver’s license under this act.

The division shall:

Notify the issuing jurisdiction that the licensee is now licensed in Wyoming and, if requested by the issuing jurisdiction, return any surrendered license to the issuing jurisdiction together with information if the licensee is now licensed in Wyoming; or

Send a copy of the affidavit of “No License in Possession” to the issuing jurisdiction together with information the licensee is now licensed in Wyoming.

The division shall issue a driver’s license to each qualified applicant not later than sixty (60) days from the date of the completed application.

Any person licensed as a driver under this act may exercise the privilege upon all streets and highways in this state and shall not be required to obtain any other license from any county, municipal or local board, or any other body having authority to adopt local regulations.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.5; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.5; Laws 1977, ch. 28, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 22, § 2; 1989, ch. 176, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 145, § 2; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, inserted “Notify the issuing jurisdiction that the licensee is now licensed in Wyoming and, if requested by the issuing jurisdiction,” in (d)(i).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote (c) which read: “No person shall have more than one (1) valid driver’s license at any time. A person shall surrender to the division all valid driver’s licenses in his possession or any person who has been previously licensed in this or any other state who does not have in their possession the license previously issued in this or any other state shall complete an affidavit of ‘No License in Possession’, before receiving a driver’s license under this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Legislature constitutionally exercises police power in requiring valid driver's license. —

In requiring one to have a valid driver's license while operating a motor vehicle upon the highways of the state, the legislature constitutionally exercised its police power to regulate the use of the highways in the interest of public safety and welfare. Hanson v. State, 673 P.2d 657,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 401

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Nollsch v. State, 768 P.2d 603,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1989); Basolo v. Basolo, 907 P.2d 348,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1995); Lawrence v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co., 2006 WY 56, 133 P.3d 976,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. May 10, 2006).

§ 31-7-107.
Persons exempted.

The following persons are exempt from the licensing requirement under this act:

Any employee of the United States government while operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to the United States government and being operated on official business unless the employee is required by the United States government or any agency thereof to have a state driver’s license;

A nonresident who has in his immediate possession a valid license issued to him by the licensing authority in his place of residence;

A nonresident on active duty in the armed forces of the United States who has a valid license issued by his state of residence and the nonresident’s spouse or dependent son or daughter who has a valid license issued by the person’s state of residence;

Any person on active duty in the armed forces of the United States who has in his immediate possession a valid license issued in a foreign country by the armed forces of the United States but only for a period of forty-five (45) days from the date of his return to the United States;

A nonresident full-time student at the University of Wyoming, a Wyoming community college, a school licensed in this state offering post-secondary education or at a parochial, church or religious school as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iv) offering post secondary education, who has in his immediate possession a valid license issued to him by the licensing authority of his place of residence;

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 145, §§ 2, 5.

A resident possessing a valid driver’s license issued by a member state of the Driver’s License Compact, W.S.

31-7-201

and

31-7-202

, provided:

A resident possessing a commercial driver’s license shall only be exempt from the licensing requirement under this act for thirty (30) days; and

A resident possessing any other driver’s license shall only be exempt from the licensing requirement under this act for one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 238, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-275.6; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.6; Laws 1976, ch. 16, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 22, § 2; 1989, ch. 192, § 1; 1993, ch. 145, §§ 2, 5; 1999, ch. 35, § 1; ch. 82, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).